Nevada, session 83, SB84.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 439.258 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.258 1. The Division shall evaluate, certify and monitor
programs for the treatment of persons who commit domestic
violence in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection 2.
2. The Division shall adopt regulations governing the
evaluation, certification and monitoring of programs for the
treatment of persons who commit domestic violence.
3. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include, without limitation, provisions:
(a) Requiring that a program:
(1) Include a module specific to victim safety; and
(2) Be based on:
(I) Evidence-based practices; and
(II) The assessment of a program participant by a
supervisor of treatment or provider of treatment; [and]
(b) Requiring that the curriculum and instructional materials
used in a program be evidence-based; and
(c) Allowing a program that is located in another state to
become certified in this State to provide treatment to persons who:
(1) Reside in this State; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(2) Are ordered by a court in this State to participate in a
program for the treatment of persons who commit domestic
violence.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)